Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5271.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 321. (1) The department shall develop a transition bridge program for service members and veterans focused on mental health, well-being, and suicide prevention. The manager of the office shall oversee and supervise the program. (2) The department may develop the program in conjunction with 1 or more appropriate nonprofit organizations that have the primary mission of providing a holistic, individualized approach to mental health and well-being through traditional and nontraditional means or government agencies. The department may also work with any stakeholders the department considers necessary for the successful design and launch of the program. The department may contract with an appropriate government agency or nonprofit organization to operate the program. (3) All of the following apply to the program: (a) The program must be offered not less than 4 times per year and in a manner that is similar to other military transition programs that are required under 10 USC 101 to 18505. (b) Subject to subdivision (c), any individual who is an eligible member may participate in the program. (c) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, an eligible member may enroll and complete the program by not later than 1 year after that eligible member's separation date from military service. The manager of the office may waive this requirement. (d) The manager of the office shall make every practical effort to ensure that the program is available to each eligible member within 2 months immediately before and 2 months immediately after that eligible member's separation date from military service. (4) The program must include, but is not limited to, information on all of the following: (a) Warning signs for post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, substance use disorder, and suicide and suicidal ideation. (b) Traditional mental health treatment resources offered to veterans. (c) Alternative treatment options offered by federally licensed research centers. (d) Additional alternative forms of treatment. (e) Bridging the divide between military and civilian life and finding purpose in civilian life. (5) The department shall make the mental health and wellness resource guide created under section 6 of the protecting veterans mental health act available to enrolled participants in the program. (6) The department shall conduct outreach to offer the program to all members of the Michigan National Guard who are exiting military service into civilian life. (7) Any data collected under this section must not include personally identifying information. (8) A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the department or the office of mental health and 7suicide prevention within the Michigan veterans affairs agency in the performance of an official function under this section and that contains information specific to an individual service member or veteran is not subject to disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (9) As used in this section: (a) "Armed Forces of the United States" means the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, and Coast Guard, including the reserve components. (b) "Department" means the department of military and veterans affairs. (c) "Eligible member" means an individual who resides in this state and is currently serving in, or is a veteran of, any 1 of the following: (i) The Michigan National Guard. (ii) The Armed Forces of the United States, as an active duty or reserve member. (iii) The other uninformed services, as a commissioned officer. (d) "Office" means the office of mental health and suicide prevention within the Michigan veterans affairs agency. (e) "Other uniformed services" means the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Commissioned Officer Corps and the United States Public Health Service Commissioned Corps. (f) "Program" means the transition bridge program created in subsection (1). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5270(request no. H00608'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.